Washington statutes.
RCW 18.145.005

Findings.

The legislature finds it necessary to regulate the practice of court reporting at the level of certification to protect the public safety and well-being. The legislature intends that only individuals who meet and maintain minimum standards of competence may represent themselves as court reporters.

[ 1995 c 27 s 1; 1989 c 382 s 1.]